Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.380

Inspection fees—When due and payable—Arrears.

(1) The inspection fees provided for in this chapter shall become due and payable upon billing by the department.

(2) A late charge of one and one-half percent per month shall be assessed on the unpaid balance against persons more than thirty days in arrears.

(3) In addition to any other penalties, the director may refuse to perform any inspection or certification service for any person who is in arrears or who fails to pay any assessment due under the provisions of this chapter or assessments required by law to any agricultural commodity commission unless the person makes payment in full prior to such inspection or certification service.

[ 2000 c 144 s 16; 1990 c 261 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 14.]